District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.14

Accounts and transfers nontestamentary.

A transfer resulting from the application of section 19-602.12 is effective by reason of the terms of the account involved and this subchapter and is not testamentary or subject to estate administration.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 214 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).

Editor's Notes